Iowa, session 2025-2026, SSB3109.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 5 TLSB 6759XC (3) 91 jda/jh S.F. _____ Section 1. Section 256E.7, subsection 2, paragraph h, Code 1 2026, is amended by adding the following new subparagraph: 2 NEW SUBPARAGRAPH . (02) The educational standards of 3 section 256.11 relating to the social studies curriculum for 4 grades seven and eight and the personal finance literacy 5 curriculum for grades nine through twelve. 6 Sec. 2. Section 256F.4, subsection 2, Code 2026, is amended 7 by adding the following new paragraph: 8 NEW PARAGRAPH . 0u. Be subject to and comply with the 9 requirements of section 256.11 relating to the social studies 10 curriculum for grades seven and eight and the personal finance 11 literacy curriculum for grades nine through twelve in the same 12 manner as a school district. 13 Sec. 3. Section 256.11, subsection 4, paragraph a, 14 subparagraph (2), Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: 15 (2) Social studies, including instruction related to civics 16 all of the following: 17 (a) Civics . 18 (b) Success-sequence education. 19 Sec. 4. Section 256.11, subsection 5, paragraph j, 20 subparagraph (1), Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: 21 (1) One unit of health education which may include 22 personal health; food and nutrition; environmental health; 23 safety and survival skills; consumer health; family life; 24 success-sequence education; age-appropriate and research-based 25 human growth and development that incorporates the standards 26 established under section 279.50, subsection 3 , paragraph 27 âbâ ; substance use disorder and nonuse; emotional and social 28 health; health resources; cardiopulmonary resuscitation; and 29 prevention and control of disease, including age-appropriate 30 and research-based information regarding sexually transmitted 31 diseases. 32 Sec. 5. Section 256.11, subsection 5, paragraph k, 33 subparagraph (1), Code 2026, is amended by adding the following 34 new subparagraph division: 35 -1- LSB 6759XC (3) 91 jda/jh 1/ 4 S.F. _____ NEW SUBPARAGRAPH DIVISION . (j) Success-sequence education. 1 Sec. 6. Section 256.11, subsection 19, Code 2026, is amended 2 by adding the following new paragraph: 3 NEW PARAGRAPH . c. âSuccess-sequence educationâ means 4 instruction that addresses all of the following: 5 (1) The series of evidence-based, sequential milestones to 6 be accomplished prior to having children that has been shown to 7 help young adults achieve financial prosperity, physical and 8 mental health, and emotional well-being, including all of the 9 following: 10 (a) Obtaining at least a high school diploma. 11 (b) Securing full-time employment. 12 (c) Getting married. 13 (2) The evidence-based research indicating that marriage 14 generally provides financial, emotional, and health benefits to 15 the married individual and the married individualâs children. 16 (3) The evidence-based research indicating that children 17 with divorced parents generally have an increased likelihood 18 of poverty and incarceration and an increased risk of negative 19 physical and mental health outcomes. 20 Sec. 7. STATE MANDATE FUNDING SPECIFIED. In accordance 21 with section 25B.2, subsection 3, the state cost of requiring 22 compliance with any state mandate included in this Act shall 23 be paid by a school district from state school foundation aid 24 received by the school district under section 257.16. This 25 specification of the payment of the state cost shall be deemed 26 to meet all of the state funding-related requirements of 27 section 25B.2, subsection 3, and no additional state funding 28 shall be necessary for the full implementation of this Act 29 by and enforcement of this Act against all affected school 30 districts. 31